util_lex_parts/cls.lexc
LEXICON Closed
i	#;
me	#;
you	#;
he	#;
him	#;
she	#;
her	#;
it	#;
we	#;
us	#;
they	#;
them	#;
one	#;
myself	#;
yourself	#;
himself	#;
herself	#;
itself	#;
ourselves	#;
yourselves	#;
themselves	#;
oneself	#;
my	#;
mine	#;
your	#;
yours	#;
his	#;
her	#;
hers	#;
its	#;
our	#;
ours	#;
their	#;
theirs	#;
this	#;
these	#;
that	#;
those	#;
a	#;
an	#;
the	#;
who	#;
whom	#;
whose	#;
what	#;
which	#;
some	#;
somebody	#;
someone	#;
something	#;
any	#;
anybody	#;
anyone	#;
anything	#;
every	#;
everybody	#;
everyone	#;
everything	#;
each	#;
all	#;
both	#;
many	#;
much	#;
more	#;
most	#;
too	#;
enough	#;
few	#;
little	#;
fewer	#;
less	#;
least	#;
no	#;
nobody	#;
nothing	#;
none	#;
zero	#;
one	#;
two	#;
three	#;
four	#;
five	#;
six	#;
seven	#;
eight	#;
nine	#;
ten	#;
eleven	#;
twelve	#;
thirteen	#;
fourteen	#;
fifteen	#;
sixteen	#;
seventeen	#;
eighteen	#;
nineteen	#;
twenty	#;
thirty	#;
forty	#;
fifty	#;
sixty	#;
seventy	#;
eighty	#;
ninety	#;
hundred	#;
thousand	#;
million	#;
billion	#;
first	#;
second	#;
third	#;
fourth	#;
fifth	#;
sixth	#;
seventh	#;
eighth	#;
ninth	#;
tenth	#;
eleventh	#;
twelfth	#;
thirteenth	#;
fourteenth	#;
fifteenth	#;
sixteenth	#;
seventeenth	#;
eighteenth	#;
nineteenth	#;
twentieth	#;
thirtieth	#;
fortieth	#;
fiftieth	#;
sixtieth	#;
seventieth	#;
eightieth	#;
ninetieth	#;
hundredth	#;
thousandth	#;
millionth	#;
billionth	#;
be	#;
am	#;
are	#;
is	#;
was	#;
were	#;
been	#;
being	#;
have	#;
has	#;
had	#;
having	#;
will	#;
would	#;
willing	#;
can	#;
cannot	#;
could	#;
shall	#;
should	#;
may	#;
might	#;
must	#;
do	#;
does	#;
did	#;
done	#;
doing	#;
here	#;
there	#;
now	#;
then	#;
where	#;
when	#;
how	#;
why	#;
somewhere	#;
sometime	#;
somehow	#;
anywhere	#;
anytime	#;
anyhow	#;
anyway	#;
everywhere	#;
always	#;
nowhere	#;
never	#;
aboard	#;
about	#;
above	#;
across	#;
after	#;
against	#;
ago	#;
along	#;
alongside	#;
amid	#;
among	#;
amongst	#;
around	#;
as	#;
astride	#;
at	#;
atop	#;
before	#;
behind	#;
below	#;
beneath	#;
beside	#;
besides	#;
between	#;
beyond	#;
by	#;
despite	#;
de	#;
down	#;
during	#;
en	#;
except	#;
for	#;
from	#;
in	#;
inside	#;
into	#;
lest	#;
like	#;
minus	#;
near	#;
next	#;
notwithstanding	#;
of	#;
off	#;
on	#;
onto	#;
opposite	#;
out	#;
outside	#;
over	#;
par	#;
past	#;
per	#;
plus	#;
post	#;
since	#;
through	#;
throughout	#;
till	#;
to	#;
toward	#;
towards	#;
under	#;
underneath	#;
unlike	#;
until	#;
unto	#;
up	#;
upon	#;
versus	#;
via	#;
with	#;
within	#;
without	#;
worth	#;
and	#;
both	#;
but	#;
either	#;
et	#;
less	#;
minus	#;
neither	#;
nor	#;
or	#;
plus	#;
so	#;
times	#;
versus	#;
yet	#;
albeit	#;
although	#;
because	#;
if	#;
neither	#;
since	#;
so	#;
than	#;
that	#;
though	#;
till	#;
unless	#;
until	#;
whereas	#;
whether	#;
which	#;
while	#;
yes	#;
no	#;
not	#;
to	#;
